dev/ortho/ara-lat.twol
Alphabet

ا:a
ە:e
ب:b
پ:p
ت:t
ج:j
چ:c ! ch
خ:x
د:d
ر:r
ز:z
ژ:z ! zh
س:s
ش:s ! sh
غ:g ! gh
ف:f
ق:q
ك:k
گ:g
ڭ:n ! ng
ل:l
م:m
ن:n
ھ:h
و:o
ۇ:u
ۆ:ö
ۈ:ü
ۋ:w
ې:é
ى:i
ي:y
ک:k
ئ:'

ا:A
ە:E
ب:B
پ:P
ت:T
ج:J
چ:C ! CH
خ:X
د:D
ر:R
ز:Z
ژ:Z ! ZH
س:S
ش:S ! SH
غ:G ! GH
ف:F
ق:Q
ك:K
گ:G
ڭ:N ! NG
ل:L
م:M
ن:N
ھ:H
و:O
ۇ:U
ۆ:Ö
ۈ:Ü
ۋ:W
ې:É
ى:I
ي:Y
ک:K

!%{n%}:0 ;
%{h%}:h
%{g%}:g

;

Sets

Vows = i é ü ö e u o a  ;

Caps = A E B P T J CH X D R Z W S SH GH F Q K G NG L M N H I O U Ö Ü É I Y ;

Gsounds = g G ;

Rules

"Remove word-initial hamzas"
ئ:0 <=> .#. _ :Vows ;

!! Do we need to wory about other potentially ambiguous sequences?
!! gh, sh, zh, ngh
!"Split n-g sequences with apostrophe"
!%{n%}:' <=>_ :Gsounds ;

"Only capitalize word-initially"
:Caps => .#. _ ;
